Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Procedure for Exercise of Dissenters’ Rights

271B.13-200.
Notice of dissenters’ rights.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under KRS

271B.13-020

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice must state that shareholders are or may be entitled to assert dissenters’ rights under this subtitle and the corporation shall undertake to provide a copy of this subtitle to any shareholder entitled to vote at the shareholders’ meeting upon request of that shareholder.

If corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under KRS

271B.13-020

is taken without a vote of shareholders, the corporation shall notify in writing all shareholders entitled to assert dissenters’ rights that the action was taken and send them the dissenters’ notice described in KRS

271B.13-220

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 126, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-210.
Notice of intent to demand payment.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under KRS

271B.13-020

is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters’ rights:

Shall deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of his intent to demand payment for his shares if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Shall not vote his shares in favor of the proposed action.

A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not be entitled to payment for his shares under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 127, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-220.
Dissenters’ notice.

If proposed corporate action creating dissenters’ rights under KRS

271B.13-020

is authorized at a shareholders’ meeting, the corporation shall deliver a written dissenters’ notice to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of KRS

271B.13-210

.

The dissenters’ notice shall be sent no later than ten (10) days after the date the proposed corporate action was authorized by the shareholders, or, if no shareholder authorization was obtained, by the board of directors, and shall:

State where the payment demand must be sent and where and when certificates for certificated shares must be deposited;

Inform holders of uncertificated shares to what extent transfer of the shares will be restricted after the payment demand is received;

Supply a form for demanding payment that includes the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action and requires that the person asserting dissenters’ rights certify whether or not he acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before that date;

Set a date by which the corporation must receive the payment demand, which date may not be fewer than thirty (30), nor more than sixty (60) days after the date the notice provided in subsection (1) of this section is delivered; and

Be accompanied by a copy of this subtitle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 128, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-230.
Duty to demand payment.

A shareholder who is sent a dissenters’ notice described in KRS

271B.13-220

shall demand payment, certify whether he acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the dissenters’ notice pursuant to subsection (2)(c) of KRS

271B.13-220

, and deposit his certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice.

The shareholder who demands payment and deposits his share certificates under subsection (1) of this section shall retain all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are canceled or modified by the taking of the proposed corporate action.

A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit his share certificates where required, each by the date set in the dissenters’ notice, shall not be entitled to payment for his shares under this subtitle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 129, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-240.
Share restrictions.

The corporation may restrict the transfer of uncertificated shares from the date the demand for their payment is received until the proposed corporate action is taken or the restrictions released under KRS

271B.13-260

.

The person for whom dissenters’ rights are asserted as to uncertificated shares shall retain all other rights of a shareholder until these rights are canceled or modified by the taking of the proposed corporate action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 130, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-250.
Payment.

Except as provided in KRS

271B.13-270

, as soon as the proposed corporate action is taken, or upon receipt of a payment demand, the corporation shall pay each dissenter who complied with KRS

271B.13-230

the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of his shares, plus accrued interest.

The payment shall be accompanied by:

The corporation’s balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares;

An explanation of how the interest was calculated; and

A statement of the dissenter’s right to demand payment under KRS

271B.13-280

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 131, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-260.
Failure to take action.

If the corporation does not take the proposed action within sixty (60) days after the date set for demanding payment and depositing share certificates, the corporation shall return the deposited certificates and release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares.

If after returning deposited certificates and releasing transfer restrictions, the corporation takes the proposed action, it shall send a new dissenters’ notice under KRS

271B.13-220

and repeat the payment demand procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 132, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-270.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by KRS

271B.13-250

from a dissenter unless he was the beneficial owner of the shares before the date set forth in the dissenters’ notice as the date of the first announcement to news media or to shareholders of the terms of the proposed corporate action.

To the extent the corporation elects to withhold payment under subsection (1) of this section, after taking the proposed corporate action, it shall estimate the fair value of the shares, plus accrued interest, and shall pay this amount to each dissenter who agrees to accept it in full satisfaction of his demand. The corporation shall send with its offer a statement of its estimate of the fair value of the shares, an explanation of how the interest was calculated, and a statement of the dissenter’s right to demand payment under KRS

271B.13-280

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 133, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.13-280.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A dissenter may notify the corporation in writing of his own estimate of the fair value of his shares and amount of interest due, and demand payment of his estimate (less any payment under KRS

271B.13-250

), or reject the corporation’s offer under KRS

271B.13-270

and demand payment of the fair value of his shares and interest due, if:

The dissenter believes that the amount paid under KRS

271B.13-250

or offered under KRS

271B.13-270

is less than the fair value of his shares or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

The corporation fails to make payment under KRS 271B.13-250 within sixty (60) days after the date set for demanding payment; or

The corporation, having failed to take the proposed action, does not return the deposited certificates or release the transfer restrictions imposed on uncertificated shares within sixty (60) days after the date set for demanding payment.

A dissenter waives his right to demand payment under this section unless he shall notify the corporation of his demand in writing under subsection (1) of this section within thirty (30) days after the corporation made or offered payment for his shares.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 134, effective January 1, 1989.